Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-2446
Automated machine
prohibited.

Any automated machine that dispenses,
delivers, or makes available, other than by administration, prescription medication
directly to a patient or caregiver without
the provision of pharmacist care is prohibited.

Laws 2008, LB308, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB326, § 5.